Minnesota, session 2025-2026, HF3349.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF MINNESOTA: Section 1. Minnesota Statutes 2025 Supplement, section 121A.224, subdivision 2, is amended to read: Subd. 2. High school students. A school district or charter school deleted text begin maydeleted text end new text begin mustnew text end allow a student in grades 9 through 12 to possess and administer an opiate antagonist to another high school student. The protections of section 604A.04 apply to the possession and administration of opiate antagonists according to this section.